Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7601
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-7601 to 44-7618 shall be known and may be cited as the Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1014, § 1.